Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Oil and Gas Production Tax.
Sec. 43.55.165.
Lease expenditures.

For purposes of this chapter, a producer’s lease expenditures for a calendar year are

costs, other than items listed in (e) of this section, that are

incurred by the producer during the calendar year after March 31, 2006, to explore for, develop, or produce oil or gas deposits located within the producer’s leases or properties in the state or, in the case of land in which the producer does not own an operating right, operating interest, or working interest, to explore for oil or gas deposits within other land in the state; and

allowed by the department by regulation, based on the department’s determination that the costs satisfy the following three requirements:

the costs must be incurred upstream of the point of production of oil and gas;

the costs must be ordinary and necessary costs of exploring for, developing, or producing, as applicable, oil or gas deposits; and

the costs must be direct costs of exploring for, developing, or producing, as applicable, oil or gas deposits;

a reasonable allowance for that calendar year, as determined under regulations adopted by the department, for overhead expenses that are directly related to exploring for, developing, or producing, as applicable, the oil or gas deposits; and

lease expenditures incurred in a previous calendar year, subject to (l) — (r) of this section, that

met the requirements of AS

43.55.160(e)

in the year in which the lease expenditures were incurred;

have not been deducted in the determination of the production tax value of oil and gas under AS

43.55.160(a)

or (h) in a previous calendar year;

were not the basis of a credit under this title; and

were incurred to explore for, develop, or produce an oil or gas deposit located in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin.

For purposes of (a) of this section,

direct costs include

an expenditure, when incurred, to acquire an item if the acquisition cost is otherwise a direct cost, notwithstanding that the expenditure may be required to be capitalized rather than treated as an expense for financial accounting or federal income tax purposes;

payments of or in lieu of property taxes, sales and use taxes, motor fuel taxes, and excise taxes;

an activity does not need to be physically located on, near, or within the premises of the lease or property within which an oil or gas deposit being explored for, developed, or produced is located in order for the cost of the activity to be a cost upstream of the point of production of the oil or gas;

in determining whether costs are lease expenditures, the department may consider, among other factors, the

typical industry practices and standards in the state that determine the costs, other than items listed in (e) of this section, that an operator is allowed to bill a producer that is not the operator, under unit operating agreements or similar operating agreements that were in effect before December 2, 2005, and were subject to negotiation with at least one producer with substantial bargaining power, other than the operator; and

standards adopted by the Department of Natural Resources that determine the costs, other than items listed in (e) of this section, that a lessee is allowed to deduct from revenue in calculating net profits under a lease issued under AS

38.05.180(f)(3)(B)

, (D), or (E).

[Repealed, § 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007.]

[Repealed, § 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007.]

For purposes of this section, lease expenditures do not include

depreciation, depletion, or amortization;

oil or gas royalty payments, production payments, lease profit shares, or other payments or distributions of a share of oil or gas production, profit, or revenue, except that a producer’s lease expenditures applicable to oil and gas produced from a lease issued under AS

38.05.180(f)(3)(B)

, (D), or (E) include the share of net profit paid to the state under that lease;

taxes based on or measured by net income;

interest or other financing charges or costs of raising equity or debt capital;

acquisition costs for a lease or property or exploration license;

costs arising from fraud, wilful misconduct, gross negligence, violation of law, or failure to comply with an obligation under a lease, permit, or license issued by the state or federal government;

fines or penalties imposed by law;

costs of arbitration, litigation, or other dispute resolution activities that involve the state or concern the rights or obligations among owners of interests in, or rights to production from, one or more leases or properties or a unit;

costs incurred in organizing a partnership, joint venture, or other business entity or arrangement;

amounts paid to indemnify the state; the exclusion provided by this paragraph does not apply to the costs of obtaining insurance or a surety bond from a third-party insurer or surety;

surcharges levied under AS

43.55.201

or

43.55.300

;

an expenditure otherwise deductible under (b) of this section that is a result of an internal transfer, a transaction with an affiliate, or a transaction between related parties, or is otherwise not an arm’s length transaction, unless the producer establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the amount of the expenditure does not exceed the fair market value of the expenditure;

an expenditure incurred to purchase an interest in any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, or any other business entity, whether or not the transaction is treated as an asset sale for federal income tax purposes;

a tax levied under AS

43.55.011

or

43.55.014

;

costs incurred for dismantlement, removal, surrender, or abandonment of a facility, pipeline, well pad, platform, or other structure, or for the restoration of a lease, field, unit, area, tract of land, body of water, or right-of-way in conjunction with dismantlement, removal, surrender, or abandonment; a cost is not excluded under this paragraph if the dismantlement, removal, surrender, or abandonment for which the cost is incurred is undertaken for the purpose of replacing, renovating, or improving the facility, pipeline, well pad, platform, or other structure;

costs incurred for containment, control, cleanup, or removal in connection with any unpermitted release of oil or a hazardous substance and any liability for damages imposed on the producer or explorer for that unpermitted release; this paragraph does not apply to the cost of developing and maintaining an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan under AS

46.04.030

;

costs incurred to satisfy a work commitment under an exploration license under AS

38.05.132

;

that portion of expenditures, that would otherwise be qualified capital expenditures, as defined in AS

43.55.023

, incurred during a calendar year that are less than the product of $0.30 multiplied by the total taxable production from each lease or property, in BTU equivalent barrels, during that calendar year, except that, when a portion of a calendar year is subject to this provision, the expenditures and volumes shall be prorated within that calendar year;

costs incurred for repair, replacement, or deferred maintenance of a facility, a pipeline, a structure, or equipment, other than a well, that results in or is undertaken in response to a failure, problem, or event that results in an unscheduled interruption of, or reduction in the rate of, oil or gas production; or costs incurred for repair, replacement, or deferred maintenance of a facility, a pipeline, a structure, or equipment, other than a well, that is undertaken in response to, or is otherwise associated with, an unpermitted release of a hazardous substance or of gas; however, costs under this paragraph that would otherwise constitute lease expenditures under (a) and (b) of this section may be treated as lease expenditures if the department determines that the repair or replacement is solely necessitated by an act of war, by an unanticipated grave natural disaster or other natural phenomenon of an exceptional, inevitable, and irresistible character, the effects of which could not have been prevented or avoided by the exercise of due care or foresight, or by an intentional or negligent act or omission of a third party, other than a party or its agents in privity of contract with, or employed by, the producer or an operator acting for the producer, but only if the producer or operator, as applicable, exercised due care in operating and maintaining the facility, pipeline, structure, or equipment, and took reasonable precautions against the act or omission of the third party and against the consequences of the act or omission; in this paragraph,

“costs incurred for repair, replacement, or deferred maintenance of a facility, a pipeline, a structure, or equipment” includes costs to dismantle and remove the facility, pipeline, structure, or equipment that is being replaced;

“hazardous substance” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.826

;

“replacement” includes renovation or improvement;

costs incurred to construct, acquire, or operate a refinery or crude oil topping plant, regardless of whether the products of the refinery or topping plant are used in oil or gas exploration, development, or production operations; however, if a producer owns a refinery or crude oil topping plant that is located on or near the premises of the producer’s lease or property in the state and that processes the producer’s oil produced from that lease or property into a product that the producer uses in the operation of the lease or property in drilling for or producing oil or gas, the producer’s lease expenditures include the amount calculated by subtracting from the fair market value of the product used the prevailing value, as determined under AS

43.55.020(f)

, of the oil that is processed;

costs of lobbying, public relations, public relations advertising, or policy advocacy.

For purposes of AS

43.55.023(a)

and only as to expenditures incurred to explore for an oil or gas deposit located within land in which an explorer does not own a working interest, the term “producer” in this section includes “explorer.”

The department shall specify or approve a reasonable allocation method for determining the portion of a cost that is appropriately treated as a lease expenditure under this section if a cost that would otherwise constitute a lease expenditure under this section is incurred to explore for, develop, or produce

both an oil or gas deposit located within land outside the state and an oil or gas deposit located within a lease or property, or other land, in the state; or

an oil or gas deposit located partly within land outside the state and partly within a lease or property, or other land, in the state.

The department shall adopt regulations that provide for reasonable methods of allocating costs between oil and gas, between gas subject to AS

43.55.011(o)

and other gas, and between leases or properties in those circumstances where an allocation of costs is required to determine lease expenditures that are costs of exploring for, developing, or producing oil deposits or costs of exploring for, developing, or producing gas deposits, or that are costs of exploring for, developing, or producing oil or gas deposits located within different leases or properties.

The department may adopt regulations that establish additional standards necessary to carrying out the purposes of this section and AS

43.55.170

, including the incorporation of the concepts of 26 U.S.C. 482 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, the related or accompanying regulations of that provision, and any ruling or guidance issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service that relates to that provision.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 4 4SSLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 4 4SSLA 2016.]

In a calendar year, after application of a producer’s lease expenditures that are incurred in that calendar year, the producer may choose to apply all or a portion of a carried-forward annual loss or carry any unused portion forward. The department may not require a producer to apply all or a portion of a carried-forward annual loss in a calendar year.

During a calendar year in which a taxpayer’s liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

is determined under AS

43.55.011(f)

, the maximum amount of carried-forward annual loss that a taxpayer may apply in that year is equal to the amount, when combined with the lease expenditures of the current year and any credits under this chapter, necessary to reduce the amount calculated under AS

43.55.011(e)

to the equivalent amount of tax due under AS

43.55.011(f)

before the application of any credits under this chapter. An amount of carried-forward annual loss not applied under this subsection may continue to be carried forward.

A carried-forward annual loss may only be applied

to determine the production tax value of oil or gas for a category for which a separate annual production tax value is required to be calculated under AS

43.55.160(a)

or (h) if the lease expenditure resulting in the carried-forward annual loss was incurred in the same category;

beginning in the calendar year in which regular production of oil or gas from the lease or property where the lease expenditure resulting in the carried-forward annual loss was incurred commences.

A carried-forward annual loss for a lease expenditure incurred on a lease or property that

did not commence regular production of oil or gas before or during the year the lease expenditure was incurred decreases in value each year by one-tenth of the value of the carried-forward annual loss in the preceding year, beginning January 1 of the 11th calendar year after the lease expenditure is carried forward under (a)(3) of this section; a decrease in value under this paragraph does not apply for a year in which the department determines that regular production of oil or gas did not commence because of a natural disaster, an injunction or other court order, or an administrative order;

commenced regular production of oil or gas before or during the year the lease expenditure was incurred decreases in value each year by one-tenth of the value of the carried-forward annual loss in the preceding year, beginning January 1 of the eighth calendar year after the lease expenditure is carried forward under (a)(3) of this section.

A carried-forward annual loss under (o) of this section may not decrease in value for a partial calendar year.

For purposes of (n)(2) and (o) of this section, the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission shall determine the commencement of regular production.

In adopting a regulation that defines the lease or property where a lease expenditure resulting in a carried-forward annual loss is incurred for purposes of (n) and (o) of this section, the department shall include an exploration lease expenditure that is reasonably related to the lease or property.

For purposes of this section,

“carried-forward annual loss” means a loss established under (a)(3) of this section;

“explore” includes conducting geological or geophysical exploration, including drilling a stratigraphic test well;

“ordinary and necessary” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 162 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, and regulations adopted under that section;

“stratigraphic test well” means a well drilled for the sole purpose of obtaining geological information to aid in exploring for an oil or gas deposit and the target zones of which are located in the state.

History.

(§ 25 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 58 — 62, 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 62 ch 14 SLA 2014; am §§ 29, 34 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am §§ 25 — 28 ch 3 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

Former subsections (j) and (k) were enacted as (k) and (

l

); relettered in 2008 at which time subsection (j) was relettered as (

l

) and references in (a), (k) [relettered as (j)] and (

l

) [relettered as (k)] of this section were conformed. In 2017, subsection (

l

) was relettered as (s) and subsections (m) — (s) were relettered as (

l

) — (r) at which time references in (a), (p), (q), and (r) were conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

Cross references.

For transition provision relating to the continued application of subsections (j) and (k) following their repeal on January 1, 2018, to a “producer’s total lease expenditures for a calendar year after 2006 and before 2010 under
AS

43.55.165

, as that section read on December 31, 2017”, see sec. 36,
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2017 amendments by secs. 25 and 28, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, to this section, see sec. 35, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “Except as provided in (j) and (k) of this section,” and made a related change; repealed (j) and (k).

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, added (a)(3), and made related changes; in (f) deleted “and (b)” following “For purposes of AS

43.55.023(a)

”; added (

l

)(4) [now (s)(4)]; added (m) through (s) [now (

l

) through (r)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, proposals relating to how costs associated with a producer's lease expenditures are to be established for the purpose of determining allowable deductions against the oil and gas production tax, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

Sec. 43.55.170.
Adjustments to lease expenditures.

A producer’s lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

must be adjusted by subtracting payments or credits, other than tax credits, received by the producer or by an operator acting for the producer for

the use by another person of a production facility in which the producer has an ownership interest or the management by the producer of a production facility under a management agreement providing for the producer to receive a management fee;

a reimbursement or similar payment that offsets the producer’s lease expenditures, including an insurance recovery from a third-party insurer and a payment from the state or federal government for reimbursement of the producer’s upstream costs, including costs for gathering, separating, cleaning, dehydration, compressing, or other field handling associated with the production of oil or gas upstream of the point of production;

the sale or other transfer of

an asset, including geological, geophysical, or well data or interpretations, acquired by the producer as a result of a lease expenditure or an expenditure that would be a lease expenditure if it were incurred after March 31, 2006; for purposes of this subparagraph,

if a producer removes from the state, for use outside the state, an asset described in this subparagraph, the value of the asset at the time it is removed is considered a payment received by the producer for sale or transfer of the asset;

for a transaction that is an internal transfer or is otherwise not an arm’s length transaction, if the sale or transfer of the asset is made for less than fair market value, the amount subtracted must be the fair market value; and

oil or gas

that is not considered produced from a lease or property under AS

43.55.020(e)

; and

the cost of acquiring which is a lease expenditure incurred by the person that acquires the oil or gas.

Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, if one or more payments or credits subject to this section are received by a producer or by an operator acting for the producer during a calendar year and if either the total amount of the payments or credits exceeds the amount of the producer’s applicable lease expenditures for that calendar year or the producer has no lease expenditures for that calendar year, the producer shall nevertheless subtract those payments or credits from the lease expenditures or from zero, respectively, and the producer’s applicable adjusted lease expenditures for that calendar year are a negative number and shall be applied to the pertinent calculation under AS

43.55.160(a)

as a negative number.

For purposes of AS

43.55.023(a)

and only as to expenditures incurred to explore for an oil or gas deposit located within land in which an explorer does not own a working interest, the term “producer” in this section includes “explorer.”

History.

(§ 25 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am § 63 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 29 ch 3 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (c), deleted “and (b)” following “AS

43.55.023(a)

”.

Sec. 43.55.180.
Required report.

The department shall study

the effects of the provisions of this chapter on oil and gas exploration, development, and production in the state, on investment expenditures for oil and gas exploration, development, and production in the state, on the entry of new producers into the oil and gas industry in the state, on state revenue, and on tax administration and compliance, giving particular attention to the tax rates provided under AS

43.55.011

, the tax credits provided under AS

43.55.023

—

43.55.025

, and the deductions for and adjustments to lease expenditures provided under AS

43.55.160

—

43.55.170

; and

the effects of the tax rates under AS

43.55.011(i)

on state revenue and on oil and gas exploration, development, and production on private land, and the fairness of those tax rates for private landowners.

The department shall prepare a report on or before the first day of the 2011 regular session of the legislature on the results of the study made under (a) of this section, including recommendations as to whether any changes should be made to this chapter. The department shall notify the legislature that the report prepared under this subsection is available.

History.

(§ 25 ch 2 TSSLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.